Illinois, session 104th, HB3593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 10, and 40 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 88/5)7    Sec. 5. Purpose; findings. 8    (a) The purpose of this Act is to advance the prompt and 9accurate payment of health care services through fair and 10reasonable billing and collection practices of hospitals.11    (b) The General Assembly finds that:12        (1) Medical debts are the cause of an increasing 13    number of bankruptcies in Illinois and are typically 14    associated with severe financial hardship incurred by 15    bankrupt persons and their families.16        (2) Patients, hospitals, and government bodies alike 17    will benefit from clearly articulated standards regarding 18    fair billing and collection practices for all Illinois 19    hospitals.20        (3) Hospitals should employ responsible standards when 21    collecting debt from their patients.22        (4) Patients should be provided sufficient billing 23    information from hospitals to determine the accuracy of   HB3593- 2 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    the bills for which they may be financially responsible.2        (5) Patients should be given a fair and reasonable 3    opportunity to discuss and assess the accuracy of their 4    bill.5        (6) Hospitals should provide patients with timely and 6    meaningful access to any financial assistance available 7    through the hospital and any public health insurance 8    programs for which patients may be eligible to prevent 9    patients from ending up with avoidable medical debt. 10    Hospitals should assist patients who need financial 11    assistance to access it. Patients who are deemed eligible 12    for hospital financial assistance or public health 13    insurance programs should not be improperly billed, 14    steered into payment plans, or sent to collections.15        (7) Hospitals should offer patients the opportunity to 16    enter into a reasonable payment plan for their hospital 17    care.18        (8) Patients have an obligation to pay for the 19    hospital services they receive subject to any discounts or 20    free care for which they are eligible under Illinois law. 21        (9) Hospitals have an obligation to screen uninsured 22    patients before pursuing collection action. To promote the 23    general welfare and to mitigate the negative impact that 24    medical debt has on accessing and using needed health 25    care, hospitals should not attempt to collect a debt from 26    an uninsured patient without first adequately screening   HB3593- 3 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    the patient for public health insurance programs and 2    financial assistance available to the patient and 3    assisting the patient in obtaining the hospital financial 4    assistance for which they are eligible. 5        (10) Hospitals are increasingly outsourcing on-site 6    health care services to third-party individuals or 7    entities without extending the screening, billing, and 8    collections protections afforded to hospital patients 9    under this Act. A hospital's obligation to patients under 10    this Act should continue when a hospital has outsourced or 11    otherwise contracted with a third-party individual or 12    entity to provide specific health care services within the 13    hospital building, or otherwise on the hospital site. 14(Source: P.A. 103-323, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (210 ILCS 88/10)16    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:17    "Collection action" means any referral of a bill to a 18collection agency or law firm to collect payment for services 19from a patient or a patient's guarantor for hospital services.20    "Health care plan" means a health insurance company, 21health maintenance organization, preferred provider 22arrangement, or third party administrator authorized in this 23State to issue policies or subscriber contracts or administer 24those policies and contracts that reimburse for inpatient and 25outpatient services provided in a hospital. Health care plan,   HB3593- 4 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1however, does not include any government-funded program such 2as Medicare or Medicaid, workers' compensation, and accident 3liability insurers.4    "Insured patient" means a patient who is insured by a 5health care plan.6    "Medical debt" means a debt arising from the receipt of 7health care services, products, or devices. 8    "Outsource" or "outsourcing" means a business arrangement 9where the hospital has contracted services or functions to be 10performed by an external individual or entity on a contract 11basis, although the services or functions may still be 12performed on the hospital site. "Outsourced" or "outsourcing" 13is distinct from an in-network or out-of-network contracted 14relationship with an insurer described in Section 50. 15    "Patient" means the individual receiving services from the 16hospital and any individual who is the guarantor of the 17payment for such services. 18    "Public health insurance program" means Medicare; 19Medicaid; medical assistance under the Non-Citizen Victims of 20Trafficking, Torture and Other Serious Crimes program; Health 21Benefit for Immigrant Adults; Health Benefit for Immigrant 22Seniors; All Kids; or other medical assistance programs 23offered by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services. 24    "Reasonable payment plan" means a plan to pay a hospital 25bill that is offered to the patient or the patient's legal 26representative and takes into account the patient's available   HB3593- 5 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1income and assets, the amount owed, and any prior payments.2    "Screen" or "screening" means a process whereby a hospital 3engages with a patient to review and assess the patient's 4potential eligibility for any financial assistance offered by 5the hospital, public health insurance program, or other 6discounted care known to the hospital; informs the patient of 7the hospital's assessment; documents in the patient's record 8the circumstances of the screening; and assists with the 9application for hospital financial assistance. 10    "Uninsured patient" means a patient who is not insured by 11a health care plan and is not a beneficiary under a 12government-funded program, workers' compensation, or accident 13liability insurance. 14(Source: P.A. 103-323, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (210 ILCS 88/40)16    Sec. 40. Hospital agents; outsourced health care services 17on-site. 18    (a) The hospital must ensure that any external collection 19agency, law firm, or individual engaged by the hospital to 20obtain payment of outstanding bills for hospital services 21agrees in writing to comply with the collections provisions of 22this Act. 23    (b) The hospital's obligation to patients under this Act 24shall cover all health care services, including, but not 25limited to, on-site health care services provided by a   HB3593- 6 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1non-hospital entity.2    (c) In the event the hospital outsources health care 3services to an individual or entity that is separate from the 4hospital within the hospital facility or otherwise on the 5hospital site, the hospital's obligations under this Act 6continue as though the hospital had provided the health care 7services.8    (d) The hospital must ensure that the individual or entity 9contracted to provide health care services agrees in writing 10to operate under the hospital's financial assistance policy, 11screening obligations, collections provisions, and all other 12provisions of this Act.13    (e) The hospital is responsible for ensuring a hospital 14agent or on-site provider of outsourced health care services 15complies with this Act. 16(Source: P.A. 94-885, eff. 1-1-07.) 17    Section 10. The Hospital Uninsured Patient Discount Act is 18amended by changing Sections 5 and 10 as follows: 19    (210 ILCS 89/5)20    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:21    "Community health center" means a federally qualified 22health center as defined in Section 1905(l)(2)(B) of the 23federal Social Security Act or a federally qualified health 24center look-alike.  HB3593- 7 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    "Cost to charge ratio" means the ratio of a hospital's 2costs to its charges taken from its most recently filed 3Medicare cost report (CMS 2552-96 Worksheet C, Part I, PPS 4Inpatient Ratios).5    "Critical Access Hospital" means a hospital that is 6designated as such under the federal Medicare Rural Hospital 7Flexibility Program.8    "Family income" means the sum of a family's annual 9earnings and cash benefits from all sources before taxes, less 10payments made for child support.11    "Federal poverty income guidelines" means the poverty 12guidelines updated periodically in the Federal Register by the 13United States Department of Health and Human Services under 14authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).15    "Financial assistance" means a discount provided to a 16patient under the terms and conditions a hospital offers to 17qualified patients or as required by law. 18    "Free and charitable clinic" means a 501(c)(3) tax-exempt 19health care organization providing health services to 20low-income uninsured or underinsured individuals that is 21recognized by either the Illinois Association of Free and 22Charitable Clinics or the National Association of Free and 23Charitable Clinics. 24    "Guaranteed income program" means a publicly or privately 25funded program that provides one-time or recurring 26unconditional cash transfers or payments, or gifts to   HB3593- 8 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1individuals or households, for a defined number of months or 2years for the purposes of reducing poverty, promoting economic 3mobility, or increasing the financial stability of Illinois 4residents. 5    "Health care services" means any medically necessary 6inpatient or outpatient hospital service, including 7pharmaceuticals or supplies provided by a hospital to a 8patient.9    "Hospital" means any facility or institution required to 10be licensed pursuant to the Hospital Licensing Act or operated 11under the University of Illinois Hospital Act.12    "Illinois resident" means any person who lives in Illinois 13and who intends to remain living in Illinois indefinitely. 14Relocation to Illinois for the sole purpose of receiving 15health care benefits does not satisfy the residency 16requirement under this Act.17    "Medically necessary" means any inpatient or outpatient 18hospital service, including pharmaceuticals or supplies 19provided by a hospital to a patient, covered under Title XVIII 20of the federal Social Security Act for beneficiaries with the 21same clinical presentation as the uninsured patient. A 22"medically necessary" service does not include any of the 23following:24        (1) Non-medical services such as social and vocational 25    services.26        (2) Elective cosmetic surgery, but not plastic surgery   HB3593- 9 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    designed to correct disfigurement caused by injury, 2    illness, or congenital defect or deformity.3    "Outsource" or "outsourcing" means a business arrangement 4where the hospital has contracted services or functions to be 5performed by an external individual or entity on a contract 6basis, although the services or functions may still be 7performed on the hospital site. 8    "Rural hospital" means a hospital that is located outside 9a metropolitan statistical area.10    "Uninsured discount" means a hospital's charges multiplied 11by the uninsured discount factor.12    "Uninsured discount factor" means 1.0 less the product of 13a hospital's cost to charge ratio multiplied by 1.35.14    "Uninsured patient" means an Illinois resident who is a 15patient of a hospital and is not covered under a policy of 16health insurance and is not a beneficiary under a public or 17private health insurance, health benefit, or other health 18coverage program, including high deductible health insurance 19plans, workers' compensation, accident liability insurance, or 20other third party liability.21(Source: P.A. 102-581, eff. 1-1-22; 103-492, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    (210 ILCS 89/10)23    Sec. 10. Uninsured patient discounts. 24    (a) Eligibility.25        (1) A hospital, other than a rural hospital or   HB3593- 10 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    Critical Access Hospital, shall provide a discount from 2    its charges to any uninsured patient who applies for a 3    discount and has family income of not more than 600% of the 4    federal poverty income guidelines for all medically 5    necessary health care services exceeding $150 in any one 6    inpatient admission or outpatient encounter.7        (2) A hospital, other than a rural hospital or 8    Critical Access Hospital, shall provide a charitable 9    discount of 100% of its charges for all medically 10    necessary health care services exceeding $150 in any one 11    inpatient admission or outpatient encounter to any 12    uninsured patient who applies for a discount and has 13    family income of not more than 200% of the federal poverty 14    income guidelines. 15        (3) A rural hospital or Critical Access Hospital shall 16    provide a discount from its charges to any uninsured 17    patient who applies for a discount and has annual family 18    income of not more than 300% of the federal poverty income 19    guidelines for all medically necessary health care 20    services exceeding $300 in any one inpatient admission or 21    outpatient encounter.22        (4) A rural hospital or Critical Access Hospital shall 23    provide a charitable discount of 100% of its charges for 24    all medically necessary health care services exceeding 25    $300 in any one inpatient admission or outpatient 26    encounter to any uninsured patient who applies for a   HB3593- 11 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    discount and has family income of not more than 125% of the 2    federal poverty income guidelines. 3        (5) In determining eligibility under this Act, a 4    hospital subject to this Act shall exclude from 5    consideration any unconditional cash transfers, payments, 6    or gifts received under a guaranteed income program if:7            (A) such cash transfers, payments, or gifts are 8        excluded from consideration for determining 9        eligibility under public health insurance programs 10        administered by the State in which the State has the 11        authority to waive guaranteed income; and12            (B) the guaranteed income program is a program for 13        a defined number of months or years designed to reduce 14        poverty, promote social mobility, or increase 15        financial stability for program participants and if 16        there is an explicit plan to collect data.17        This paragraph is inoperative on and after July 1, 18    2026. 19    (b) Discount. For all health care services exceeding $300 20in any one inpatient admission or outpatient encounter, a 21hospital shall not collect from an uninsured patient, deemed 22eligible under subsection (a), more than its charges less the 23amount of the uninsured discount.24    (c) Maximum Collectible Amount.25        (1) The maximum amount that may be collected in a 26    12-month period for health care services provided by the   HB3593- 12 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    hospital from a patient determined by that hospital to be 2    eligible under subsection (a) is 20% of the patient's 3    family income, and is subject to the patient's continued 4    eligibility under this Act.5        (2) The 12-month period to which the maximum amount 6    applies shall begin on the first date, after the effective 7    date of this Act, an uninsured patient receives health 8    care services that are determined to be eligible for the 9    uninsured discount at that hospital.10        (3) To be eligible to have this maximum amount applied 11    to subsequent charges, the uninsured patient shall inform 12    the hospital in subsequent inpatient admissions or 13    outpatient encounters that the patient has previously 14    received health care services from that hospital and was 15    determined to be entitled to the uninsured discount. The 16    availability of the maximum collectible amount shall be 17    included in the hospital's financial assistance 18    information provided to uninsured patients. 19        (4) Hospitals may adopt policies to exclude an 20    uninsured patient from the application of subdivision 21    (c)(1) when the patient owns assets having a value in 22    excess of 600% of the federal poverty level for hospitals 23    in a metropolitan statistical area or owns assets having a 24    value in excess of 300% of the federal poverty level for 25    Critical Access Hospitals or hospitals outside a 26    metropolitan statistical area, not counting the following   HB3593- 13 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1    assets: the uninsured patient's primary residence; 2    personal property exempt from judgment under Section 3    12-1001 of the Code of Civil Procedure; or any amounts 4    held in a pension or retirement plan, provided, however, 5    that distributions and payments from pension or retirement 6    plans may be included as income for the purposes of this 7    Act.8    (d) Each hospital bill, invoice, or other summary of 9charges to an uninsured patient shall include with it, or on 10it, a prominent statement that an uninsured patient who meets 11certain income requirements may qualify for an uninsured 12discount and information regarding how an uninsured patient 13may apply for consideration under the hospital's financial 14assistance policy. The hospital's financial assistance 15application shall include language that directs the uninsured 16patient to contact the hospital's financial counseling 17department with questions or concerns, along with contact 18information for the financial counseling department, and shall 19state: "Complaints or concerns with the uninsured patient 20discount application process or hospital financial assistance 21process may be reported to the Health Care Bureau of the 22Illinois Attorney General.". A website, phone number, or both 23provided by the Attorney General shall be included with this 24statement. 25    (e) In the event the hospital contracts with a third-party 26individual or entity that is separate from the hospital to   HB3593- 14 -LRB104 09784 BAB 19850 b1provide health care services within the hospital facility or 2otherwise on the hospital site, the hospital's obligations 3under this Act continue as though the hospital itself provided 4the health care services. The hospital shall include charges 5from the third-party individual or entity when calculating the 6charge, discount, or collectible amount applicable under this 7Act.8    (f) The hospital's obligation to patients under this Act 9covers all health care services, including, but not limited 10to, outsourced on-site health care services provided by a 11non-hospital entity. 12    (g) The hospital must ensure that the individual or entity 13contracted to provide health care services agrees in writing 14to operate under the hospital's uninsured patient discount and 15all other provisions of this Act.16    (h) The hospital is responsible for ensuring a hospital 17agent or on-site provider of outsourced health care services 18complies with this Act. 19(Source: P.A. 102-581, eff. 1-1-22; 103-492, eff. 1-1-24.)